Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 3. Statistics

§ 61.
Information collection and confidentiality.

The Secretary may collect information on subjects within the jurisdiction of the Agency, including data obtained from questionnaires, surveys, physical samples, databases, and laboratory analyses conducted by the Agency. This information shall be available upon request to the public, provided that it is presented in a form that does not disclose the identity of individual persons, households, or businesses from whom the information was obtained or whose characteristics, activities, or products the information is about.

HISTORY:

Amended

1993, No. 125

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2021, No. 47

, § 9.

§ 62.
Repealed. 1977, No. 118 (Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Feb. 3, 1978.

§ 63.
Compilation of abstracts; forms; expenses.

On or before July 1, the town clerk shall forward such abstracts to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, who shall have the abstracts for the entire State compiled and shall make such information available for the newspapers and people of the State.
The Secretary shall furnish listers and town clerks with suitable forms in triplicate for collecting such information and returning such abstracts.
The expenses of the Secretary incurred under this section shall be paid from the monies annually available for the use of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.